Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1917
Quality assurance assessment; payment; computation.

Except for facilities which are exempt under section 68-1918 and facilities referred to in section 68-1919, each nursing facility or skilled nursing facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act shall pay a quality assurance assessment based on total resident days, including bed-hold days, less medicare days, for the purpose of improving the quality of nursing facility or skilled nursing facility care in this state. The assessment shall be nine dollars for each resident day for the preceding calendar quarter. The assessment in the aggregate shall not exceed the amount stated in section 68-1920.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 17;

Laws 2024, LB130, § 2.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.